California, session 20252026, AB2665.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 14105.175 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, immediately following Section 14105.17, to read:14105.175. (a) (1) The sum of five million five hundred thousand dollars ($5,500,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the State Department of Health Care Services for the purpose of providing supplemental payments, for services covered under the Medi-Cal program, to the providers described in subdivision (b).(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that these supplemental payments facilitate the maintenance of operations of the health care system in the County of Inyo and thereby prevent the closure of hospitals within the county.(b) The moneys appropriated pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be distributed as follows:(1) The sum of two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000) shall be distributed to the Northern Inyo Healthcare District.(2) The sum of three million dollars ($3,000,0000) shall be distributed to the Southern Inyo Healthcare District.(c) The payments described in this section shall be in addition to any supplemental payments received by a hospital within the County of Inyo pursuant to Section 14105.17.SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that a special statute is necessary and that a general statute cannot be made applicable within the meaning of Section 16 of Article IV of the California Constitution because of the unique and urgent circumstances facing the two hospitals serving the County of Inyo. These health facilities operate in one of the most remote and sparsely populated regions of the state, covering vast geographic distances with limited alternative access to care. Without targeted statutory relief, the financial instability threatening these hospitals places residents at serious risk of losing critical emergency and inpatient services.SECTION 1.Section 135 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:135.(a)If a department within the California Health and Human Services Agency has received approval of an operational state plan by a federal agency, or has applied and has been approved for a waiver from a federal law or federal regulation, the department shall expeditiously make any and all approved plans and waivers available to the public by publishing a hyperlink to that information on the homepage of the department’s internet website.(b)The California Health and Human Services Agency shall promptly notify the Assembly Committee on Health and the Senate Committee on Health about approved state plans or federal waivers, as described in subdivision (a) and in accordance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.SEC. 2.Section 3500 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:3500.(a)If a department within the California Health and Human Services Agency has received approval of an operational state plan by a federal agency, or has applied and has been approved for a waiver from a federal law or federal regulation, the department shall expeditiously make any and all approved plans and waivers available to the public by publishing a hyperlink to that information on the homepage of the department’s internet website.(b)The California Health and Human Services Agency shall promptly notify the Assembly Committee on Health and the Senate Committee on Health about approved state plans or federal waivers, as described in subdivision (a) and in accordance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.